Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1159.01
Department; assistive technology devices registry.

The department shall establish a registry for assistive technology devices to encourage and facilitate cooperation and shared usage of assistive technology devices. Participation by school districts, educational service units, and approved cooperatives shall be voluntary.

Laws 1997, LB 865, § 13;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 44.